trunk/resultats/catalan.dic
absol/CSZ
absolent/CR
abstragués/QZ
abstraient/CR
abstrauré/TZ
abstreu/CSZ
acreix/CSZ
acreixent/CR
acresqués/QZ
acull/CEUVYZ
admet/CSZ
admetent/CR
admetré/TZ
adorm/CUZ
adscrigués/QZ
adscriu/CSZ
adscrivint/CR
advendré/TZ
advengués/QZ
aiguabat/CSZ
aiguabatent/CERVY
ajagués/QZ
ajaient/CR
ajauré/TZ
ajeu/CSZ
ajup/CUZ
alabat/BCSVYZ
alabatent/CR
aniré/TZ
aparegués/QZ
apareix/CSZ
apareixent/CR
apercebent/CR
apercebré/TZ
aprehengués/QZ
aprehèn/CSZ
aprendré/TZ
aprenent/CFRVY
aprengués/QZ
aprèn/CSZ
arremet/CSZ
arrup/CUZ
assegués/QZ
asseient/CR
asseu/CSZ
asseuré/TZ
atengués/QZ
ateny/CSZ
atenyent/CR
atenyeré/TZ
atragués/QZ
atreu/CSZ
atén/CSZ
avendré/TZ
avengués/QZ
barbull/CEU
bat/CES
batent/CER
begués/Q
bestragués/Q
bestrauré/T
bestreu/CS
beu/CS
bevent/CER
bot/CES
botré/T
brum/CEU
brunz/CU
bull/CEU
cabent/CR
caigués/Q
caldré/T
calent/CFR
calgués/Q
cartengués/Q
carvendré/T
carvengués/Q
carvèn/CS
cern/CS
cerndré/T
cernent/CR
circumscrigués/Q
cloent/CR
clogués/Q
clou/CS
clouré/T
cogués/Q
colent/CR
colgués/Q
colltorceré/T
colltorç/CS
combatent/CER
comet/CS
cometré/T
commogués/Q
commovent/CR
comparegués/Q
compareix/CS
compareixeré/T
complaent/CER
complagués/Q
complau/CS
complauré/T
component/CER
compongués/Q
comprendré/T
comprengués/Q
compromet/CS
comprometent/CR
concebré/T
concloent/CER
conclogués/Q
conclou/CS
condoldré/T
condolgués/Q
condorm/CU
conegués/Q
coneix/CS
coneixent/CR
confondré/T
confongués/Q
consent/CU
constreny/CS
constrenyent/CR
consum/CEU
contendré/T
contengués/Q
contorcent/CR
contrabat/CS
contrabatré/T
contragués/Q
contraient/CR
contravendré/T
contravengués/Q
contén/CS
convendré/T
convengués/Q
convisqués/Q
conviu/CS
convivint/CR
corfondré/T
corfongués/Q
corprenent/CR
corprengués/Q
corprèn/CS
correspondré/T
correspongués/Q
corromp/CS
corrompent/CR
couré/T
cregués/Q
creix/CS
creixent/CER
cresqués/Q
creuré/T
cull/CU
cus/CU
debat/CES
decaient/CR
decaigués/Q
decauré/T
decreix/CS
decreixent/CER
decreixeré/T
decresqués/Q
defengués/Q
degués/Q
demet/CS
demetent/CR
demetré/T
depengués/Q
desacull/CU
desaparegués/Q
desapareix/CS
desapareixent/CR
desapareixeré/T
desaprengués/Q
desatendré/T
desatenent/CR
desatengués/Q
desatén/CS
desavengués/Q
desclogués/Q
desclouré/T
descomplau/CS
descompondré/T
descomponent/CR
descompongués/Q
descompromet/CS
desconegués/Q
desconeixent/CER
desconeixeré/T
desconvengués/Q
descregués/Q
descreu/CS
descreuré/T
descrigués/Q
descrivint/CR
desentendré/T
desentengués/Q
desentén/CS
desment/CU
desmereixent/CR
desmeresqués/Q
despendré/T
despengués/Q
desplaent/CER
desplagués/Q
desplau/CS
despondré/T
despongués/Q
desprenent/CR
desprengués/Q
desprèn/CS
destorceré/T
destorç/CS
destrenyent/CR
desvisqués/Q
desviuré/T
detengués/Q
detragués/Q
detraient/CR
detrauré/T
detreu/CS
difon/CS
difondré/T
difonent/CR
difongués/Q
dissolgués/Q
distendré/T
distenent/CR
distengués/Q
distorç/CS
distraient/CR
distrauré/T
distén/CS
dolgués/Q
dorm/CU
embeu/CSZ
embeuré/TZ
embevent/CR
empeny/CSZ
empenyent/CR
empenyeré/TZ
emprengués/QZ
encendré/TZ
encenent/CR
enclogués/QZ
enclou/CSZ
enfond/CSZ
enfondent/CR
enfondré/TZ
entrebatent/CR
entrebatré/TZ
entremet/CSZ
entreplogués/QZ
entreplouré/TZ
entreplovent/CR
entresent/CUZ
entrevendré/TZ
entrevengués/QZ
entén/CSZ
esbat/CESVYZ
esbatent/CR
esbatré/TZ
escaigués/QZ
escomet/CSZ
escometent/CR
escometré/TZ
escruix/CUYZ
escull/CEUVYZ
escup/CUZ
esdevendré/TZ
esdevengués/QZ
esmuny/CUZ
espeny/CSZ
espenyent/CR
espremeré/TZ
estenent/CR
estorceré/TZ
estorç/CSZ
estrenyent/CR
estén/CSZ
exclogués/QZ
exclouré/TZ
expenent/CR
expèn/CSZ
extragués/QZ
extrauré/TZ
fen/CS
fenent/CER
fenyeré/T
fon/CES
fonent/CR
fongués/Q
fotré/T
fum/CES
fument/CR
funy/CU
gruny/CEU
heuré/TZ
incloent/CR
inclou/CSZ
infondré/TZ
infongués/QZ
inscriu/CSZ
inscrivint/CR
interrompré/TZ
intervengués/QZ
ireix/CSZ
ireixent/CR
ireixeré/TZ
iré/TZ
jagués/Q
jaient/CER
jeu/CS
lleuré/T
malentenent/CR
malentengués/Q
malentén/CS
malmetré/T
malprenent/CR
malprèn/CS
malvendré/T
malvengués/Q
malveuent/CR
malviu/CS
malviuré/T
mamprenent/CR
mamprengués/Q
mamprèn/CS
mantendré/T
marfon/CS
marfondré/T
marfonent/CR
marfongués/Q
ment/CEU
menystendré/T
menystengués/Q
mereix/CS
mereixent/CER
metré/T
mogués/Q
mol/CES
molent/CR
mor/CU
mouré/T
muny/CU
noent/CR
nogués/Q
nom/CES
nouré/T
obvendré/TZ
obvengués/QZ
ofenent/CR
ofèn/CSZ
oldré/TZ
olgués/QZ
omet/CSZ
ometent/CR
pareixeré/T
peixent/CR
perbull/CU
percebré/T
percut/CU
perd/CS
perdent/CR
permetré/T
pernabat/CS
pernabatent/CR
pertanyeré/T
pervengués/Q
perviu/CS
perviuré/T
pervivint/CR
plagués/Q
planyent/CER
plau/CS
plauré/T
pon/CS
pondré/T
ponent/CER
pongués/Q
premor/CU
pren/CES
prendré/T
prenent/CR
prescrigués/Q
pressent/CU
presum/CU
pretendré/T
pretenent/CR
pretén/CS
prevalgués/Q
prevendré/T
promet/CS
prometent/CR
promogués/Q
promouré/T
prorromp/CS
prorrompent/CR
proscriuré/T
provengués/Q
puny/CEU
raent/CER
rau/CS
rauré/T
reabsolgués/Q
readmet/CS
readmetent/CR
readmetré/T
rebat/CES
rebatent/CER
rebatré/T
rebegués/Q
rebevent/CR
rebot/CES
rebotré/T
rebull/CEU
recaient/CR
recauré/T
reclogués/Q
reclou/CS
recoent/CR
recompondré/T
recompongués/Q
reconeix/CS
reconeixent/CER
reconvendré/T
reconvengués/Q
recreix/CS
recreixeré/T
recull/CEU
recus/CU
reescrigués/Q
reescrivint/CR
refon/CS
refondré/T
remetent/CR
remogués/Q
remol/CS
remoldré/T
removent/CR
reprendré/T
reprengués/Q
reprèn/CS
resolent/CR
respon/CS
respondré/T
respongués/Q
ressent/CU
ressurt/CU
restrenyent/CR
ret/CES
retendré/T
retonent/CR
retongués/Q
retorceré/T
retorç/CS
retraient/CR
retrauré/T
retreu/CS
retrotragués/Q
retrotraient/CR
retrovendré/T
retrovèn/CS
retruny/CEU
revencent/CR
revenceré/T
revengués/Q
reviu/CS
reviuré/T
revivint/CR
rigués/Q
riu/CES
romandré/T
romanent/CER
romp/CS
salprenent/CR
salprengués/Q
sent/CU
seu/BCEFS
sobrecreixent/CR
sobrecreixeré/T
sobrecresqués/Q
sobreentén/CS
sobreescrigués/Q
sobreescrivint/CR
sobreprèn/CS
sobresegués/Q
sobreseient/CR
sobreseuré/T
sobresurt/CU
sobreval/CS
sobrevengués/Q
sobrevivint/CR
sol/CEFS
soldré/T
solgués/Q
somovent/CR
somrigués/Q
somriu/CS
sorprenent/CER
sostendré/T
sostengués/Q
sostreu/CS
sotaescrigués/Q
sotaescrivint/CR
sotbat/CS
sotmetent/CR
sotmetré/T
subscriu/CS
subvengués/Q
surt/CEU
suspenent/CR
tem/CES
temeré/T
tengués/Q
terratrement/CR
ton/CES
tondré/T
tonent/CR
tongués/Q
traient/CR
tramet/CS
transcrigués/Q
transcrivint/CR
transfon/CS
transfondré/T
transmetent/CR
trem/CS
ullprendré/TZ
ullprenent/CR
ullprengués/QZ
ullprèn/CSZ
ven/CS
vencent/CR
vengués/Q
viu/BCES
viuré/T
vivint/CR
